Utah statutes.
70A-4-103.   Variation by agreement -- Measure of damages -- Certain action
constituting ordinary care.
(1)  The effect of the provisions of this chapter may be varied by agreement
but the parties to the agreement may not disclaim a bank's responsibility for
its lack of good faith or failure to exercise ordinary care, or limit the
measure of damages for the lack or failure.  However, the parties may
determine by agreement the standards by which the bank's responsibility is to
be measured if those standards are not manifestly unreasonable.
(2)  Federal Reserve regulations and operating circulars, clearinghouse rules,
and the like, have the effect of agreements under Subsection (1), whether or
not specifically assented to by all parties interested in items handled.
(3)  Action or nonaction approved by this chapter or pursuant to Federal
Reserve regulations or operating  circulars is the exercise of ordinary care
and, in the absence of special instructions, action or nonaction consistent
with clearinghouse rules and the like or with a general banking usage not
disapproved by this chapter, is prima facie exercise of ordinary care.
(4)  The specification or approval of certain procedures by this chapter is
not disapproval of other procedures that may be reasonable under the
circumstances.
(5)  The measure of damages for failure to exercise ordinary care in handling
an item is the amount of the item reduced by an amount that could not have
been realized by the exercise of ordinary care.  If there is bad faith, it
includes any other damages the party suffered as a proximate consequence.
